Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2150
Suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal of license or authority.

If it appears to the director that any person has committed a violation of the Insurance Holding Company System Act which makes the continued operation of an insurer contrary to the interests of policyholders or the public, the director may, after giving notice and an opportunity to be heard, determine to suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew such insurer's license or authority to do business in this state for such period as the director finds is required for the protection of policyholders or the public. Any such determination shall be accompanied by specific findings of fact and conclusions of law.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 30.